Utah statutes.
10-3b-403.   Council in a five-member council form of government.

(1)  The council in a municipality operating under a five-member council form of municipal government:

(a)  exercises any executive or administrative power and performs or supervises the performance of any executive or administrative duty or function that:

(i)  has not been given to the mayor under Section 10-3b-104; or

(ii)  has been given to the mayor under Section 10-3b-104 but is removed from the mayor under Subsection (1)(b)(i)(A);

(b)  may:

(i)  subject to Subsections (1)(c) and (2), adopt an ordinance:

(A)  removing from the mayor any power, duty, or function of the mayor under Section 10-3b-104; and

(B)  reinstating to the mayor any power, duty, or function previously removed under Subsection (1)(b)(i)(A);

(ii)  adopt an ordinance delegating to the mayor any executive or administrative power, duty, or function that the council has under Subsection (1)(a);

(iii)  appoint a manager to perform executive and administrative duties or functions that the council by ordinance delegates to the manager, subject to Subsection (1)(c);

(iv)  dismiss a manager appointed under Subsection (1)(b)(iii); and

(v)  assign any or all council members, including the mayor, to supervise one or more administrative departments of the municipality; and

(c)  may not remove from the mayor or delegate to a manager appointed by the council:

(i)  any of the mayor's legislative or judicial powers or ceremonial functions;

(ii)  the mayor's position as chair of the council; or

(iii)  any ex officio position that the mayor holds.

(2)  Adopting an ordinance under Subsection (1)(b)(i) removing from or reinstating to the mayor a power, duty, or function provided for in Section 10-3b-104 requires the affirmative vote of:

(a)  the mayor and a majority of all other council members; or

(b)  all council members except the mayor.

